Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WALLIN EDUCATION PARTNERS.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of higher education for immediate transfer to Wallin Education Partners to support programming focused on college admission and college graduation for low-income students, including financial aid, advising, and career development. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation must be used by Wallin Education Partners only for programs supporting students who are residents of Minnesota and attending colleges or universities within Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) By February 1 each fiscal year that Wallin Education Partners receives an appropriation, Wallin Education Partners must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over higher education and early childhood through grade 12 education on activities funded by this appropriation. The report must include but is not limited to information about the demographics of students served, the colleges and universities in Minnesota attended by students served, the high schools attended by students served, and the geographic distribution of the students served. new text end